Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2327
District court; Court of Appeals;
Supreme Court; remit assessment.

In every case of appeal of a conviction of any person for
any felony or misdemeanor to the district court, Court of Appeals, or Supreme
Court that is affirmed, the court shall remit the assessment as provided in
section 33-157.

Laws 2010, LB510, § 3.